District of Columbia statutes.
2-310.01a

Repealed

Application of subchapter.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 1001a
as added May 23, 1986, D.C. Law 6-116, § 2, 33 DCR 2432
June 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-134, § 6(b), 41 DCR 2597
1981 Ed., § 1-1192.1.

Temporary repeal of subchapter: Section 8(b) of D.C. Law 10-75 provided that the act shall expire on the 225th day of its having taken effect or upon the effective date of the South Africa Sanctions Repeal Act of 1993, whichever occurs first.

Temporary repeal of subchapter: Section 6(b) of D.C. Law 10-75 repealed this subchapter.